Utah statutes.
78A-6-511.1.   Posttermination reunification study item.

(1)  The division shall study the potential of creating a posttermination of parental rights reunification system, and present any viable proposals to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee during the 2013 interim.

(2)  In creating the proposals described in Subsection (1), the division shall consider the best interest of the child standard and the fundamental rights of parents.



Enacted by Chapter 416, 2013 General Session

